Utah statutes.
26-8a-506.   Investigations for enforcement of chapter.
(1)  The department may, for the purpose of ascertaining compliance with the
provisions of this chapter, enter and inspect on a routine basis the business
premises and equipment of a person:
(a)  with a certificate, designation, permit, or license; or
(b)  who holds himself out to the general public as providing a service for
which a certificate, designation, permit, or license is required under Section
26-8a-301.
(2)  Before conducting an inspection under Subsection (1), the department
shall, after identifying the person in charge:
(a)  give proper identification;
(b)  describe the nature and purpose of the inspection; and
(c)  if necessary, explain the authority of the department to conduct the
inspection.
(3)  In conducting an inspection under Subsection (1), the department may,
after meeting the requirements of Subsection (2):
(a)  inspect records, equipment, and vehicles; and
(b)  interview personnel.
(4)  An inspection conducted under Subsection (1) shall be during regular
operational hours.
